California statutes. Financial Code
(b) Any person which proposes to establish one or more places of business in this state and to transact business on a regular and continual basis at such places of business, with respect to the establishment of such places of business and the transacting of such business at such places of
 business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31036.

“California corporation” means:

(a) Any corporation organized under the General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), Title 1 of the Corporations Code) or any predecessor statute; provided, however, that “California corporation” does not include any corporation which is a close corporation, as defined in Section 158 of the Corporations Code; or

(b) Any corporation organized under Part 6 (commencing with Section 14200), Division 3, Title 1 of the Corporations Code, as added by Chapter 985 of the Statutes of 1975; or

(c) Any California nonprofit corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31037.

“California nonprofit corporation” means any corporation organized under the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) or any predecessor statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1155, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

31038.

“Control”, when used with respect to a specified person, means possession, direct or indirect, of the power to do either of the following:

(a) To vote 35 percent or more of any class of the voting securities issued by the specified person.

(b) To direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of such specified person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract (other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services), or otherwise; provided, however, that no natural person shall
 be deemed to control a person solely on account of being a director, officer, or employee of such person. For purposes of this subdivision, any person who, directly or indirectly, owns of record or beneficially, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies with discretionary authority to vote, 20 percent or more of any class of the then outstanding voting securities issued by a corporation shall be rebuttably presumed to control such corporation. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

31039.

“Controlling person”, when used with respect to a specified person, means any person who controls such specified person, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31040.

“Corporate name” means the name of a corporation as set forth in the articles of incorporation of such corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31041.

“Financial institution” means any commercial bank, trust company, savings and loan association, credit union, industrial loan company, insurance company, or person engaged in the business of lending money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31042.

“Insolvent”, when used with respect to any person, means a person who has ceased to pay his debts in the ordinary course of business, who cannot pay his debts as they become due, or whose liabilities exceed his assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31043.

To “issue”, when used with respect to any regulation or order, includes to adopt, amend, repeal, or rescind.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31044.

“License” means a license issued under this division authorizing a California corporation to transact business as a business and industrial development corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31045.

“Licensee” means a California corporation which is licensed under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31046.

“Officer” means:

(a) When used with respect to a corporation, any person appointed or designated as an officer of such corporation by or pursuant to applicable law or the articles of incorporation or bylaws of such corporation or any person who performs with respect to such corporation functions usually performed by an officer of a corporation; and

(b) When used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person or a corporation, any person who performs with respect to such specified person functions usually performed by an officer of
 a corporation with respect to such corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31047.

“Order” means any approval, consent, authorization, exemption, denial, prohibition, or requirement applicable to a specific case issued by the commissioner. “Order” includes any condition of a license and any agreement made by any person with the commissioner under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 625.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31047.5.

“Parent,” when used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person, means any person other than a natural person which controls the specified person, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

31048.

“Person” means any natural person, proprietorship, joint venture, partnership, trust, business trust, syndicate, association, joint stock company, corporation, limited liability company, government, agency of any government, or any other organization; provided, however, that “person”, when used with respect to acquiring control of or controlling a specified person, includes any combination of two or more persons acting in concert.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

31049.

“Principal shareholder”, when used with respect to a corporation, means any person who owns, directly or indirectly, of record or beneficially, securities representing 10 percent or more of the voting power of such corporation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 31047 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1570, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

31050.

To “provide financing assistance” to a person includes:

(a) To lend money or otherwise extend credit to such person;

(b) To purchase securities issued by such person, either directly or indirectly through an underwriter; and

(c) To lease property to such person.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 31048 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1570, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

31051.

To “provide management assistance” to a person includes:

(a) To provide management or technical advice to such person; and

(b) To provide management or technical services to such person.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 31049 by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1570, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

31052.

“Regulation” means any published regulation, rule, or standard of general application issued by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 626.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31053.

“Security” has the meaning set forth in Section 25019 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31054.

“Subsidiary”, when used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person, means any person other than a natural person controlled by such specified person, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31055.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, or other person to whom the commissioner delegates the authority to act for the commissioner in the particular matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 157.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31056.

“Voting power” has the meaning set forth in Corporations Code Section 194.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Administration [31100. - 31115.]

31100.

The commissioner shall administer the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 628.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31101.

(a) The commissioner may from time to time issue such regulations and orders as are in his or her opinion necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of this division.

(b) Regulations and orders issued under this division may, among other things, define any term used in this division, including (but not limited to) the term “unsafe or unsound act”, as well as any term not used in this division.

(c) For
 purposes of regulations and orders issued under this division, the commissioner may classify persons, transactions, and other matters within his or her jurisdiction, and may prescribe different regulations or orders for different classes.

(d) The commissioner may waive any provision of any regulation or order issued under this division in any case where in his or her opinion such provision is not necessary in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 629.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31102.

Whenever the commissioner issues an order or license under this division, he or she may impose such conditions as are in his or her opinion necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 630.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31103.

Every final order, decision, license, or other official act of the commissioner under this division is subject to judicial review in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 631.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31104.

In any proceeding under this division:

(a) The burden of proving that an application should be approved is upon the applicant.

(b) The burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming such exemption or such exception from a definition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31105.

No provision of this division shall be construed to require by implication that the commissioner hold a hearing on any matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 632.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31106.

No provision of this division shall be construed to require by implication that the commissioner make written findings on any matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 633.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31107.

Any application filed with the commissioner under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division shall be in such form, shall contain such information, shall be signed in such manner, and shall (if the commissioner so requires by regulation or order) be verified in such manner, as the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 634.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31108.

In determining whether to approve any application filed under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division, the commissioner may consider proposals made by the applicant, including (but not limited to) proposals to appoint officers, sell securities, or obtain financing; and, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is probable that such applicant will be able to implement any such proposal, the commissioner may make findings on the basis of such proposal; provided, however, that, whenever the commissioner approves an application on
 the basis, in whole or in part, of a proposal made by the applicant, the commissioner shall impose upon such approval appropriate conditions requiring that such applicant implement such proposal within such period of time as the commissioner may specify.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 635.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31109.

The commissioner may honor applications from interested persons for interpretive opinions regarding any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 636.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31110.

(a) The commissioner may (1) make such public or private investigations within or outside this state as he or she deems necessary to determine whether to approve any application filed with him or her under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division, to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division, to aid in the enforcement of any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this
 division, or to aid in the issuing of regulations or orders under this division, and (2) publish information concerning any violation of any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(b) For purposes of any investigation, examination, or other proceeding under this division, the commissioner may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the commissioner deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

(c) In case of contumacy by, or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to, any person, the superior court, upon application by the commissioner, may issue to such person an order requiring him to appear before the commissioner, there to produce documentary evidence, if so
 ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 637.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31110.5.

The commissioner may provide information relating to a licensee to the Small Business Administration or to any governmental agency which licenses or regulates the licensee or any parent or subsidiary of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 638.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31111.

Notwithstanding the fact that the commissioner permits any licensee, any affiliate of a licensee, or any governmental agency to inspect or make copies of any record relating to a licensee or to any director, officer, employee, or affiliate of a licensee, or that the commissioner provides any record of this type, or a copy thereof, to any person described above, any provision of Section 7922.000 of the Government Code and any provision listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code that would, but for that fact, apply to that record, shall continue to apply to the record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 115.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

31112.

The commissioner may refer such evidence as is available concerning any violation of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division which constitutes a crime to the district attorney of the county in which such violation occurred, who may, with or without such a reference, institute appropriate criminal proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 640.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31113.

Before any applicant for a license is issued a license, such applicant and each parent and subsidiary of such applicant shall file, and each person who becomes a parent or subsidiary of a licensee shall, not less than 30 days after becoming a parent or subsidiary of such licensee, file, with the commissioner, in such form as the commissioner may by regulation or order require, an irrevocable consent appointing the commissioner and his or her successor from time to time in office to be such person’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any
 noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against such person, or his or her successor, executor, or administrator, which arises under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division after such consent has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on such person. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process at any office of the commissioner, but such service is not effective unless (a) the party making such service, who may be the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of such service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the party served at his or her last address on file with the commissioner, and (b) an affidavit of compliance with this section by the party making service is filed in the case on or before the return date, if any, or within such further time as the court, in the case of a judicial proceeding, or the administrative agency, in the case of an administrative proceeding, allows.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 641.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31114.

Whenever any person, including any nonresident of this state, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this division or by any regulation or order issued under this division, whether or not the person has filed a consent to service of process under Section 31113, and if personal jurisdiction over the person cannot otherwise be obtained in this state, that conduct shall be considered equivalent to the person’s appointment of the commissioner and the commissioner’s successor from time to time in office to be the person’s attorney to receive service of
 any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against him or her, or his or her successor, executor, or administrator, which grows out of that conduct and which is brought under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division, with the same force and validity as if served on him or her personally. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in any office of the commissioner, but the service is not effective unless (a) the party making the service, who may be the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the party served at his or her last known address or takes other steps which are reasonably calculated to give actual notice, and (b) an affidavit of compliance with this section by the party making service is filed in the case on or before the return date, if any, or within such further time as the court, in the case of a judicial proceeding, or the administrative agency, in
 the case of an administrative proceeding, allows.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 642.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31115.

(a) Fees shall be paid to, and collected by, the commissioner, as follows:

(1) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application for a license shall be two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(2) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application for approval to acquire control of a licensee shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(3) The fee for
 filing with the commissioner an application for approval for a licensee to merge with another corporation; an application for approval for a licensee to purchase all or substantially all of the business of another person, or an application for approval for a licensee to sell all or substantially all of its business or of the business of any of its offices to another licensee, shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000). However, whenever two or more applications relating to the same merger, purchase, or sale are filed with the commissioner, the fee for filing each application shall be the quotient determined by dividing one thousand dollars ($1,000) by the number of the applications.

(4) The fee for filing with the commissioner an application for approval to relocate the head office of a licensee shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

(5) The fee for issuing a license shall be
 twenty-five dollars ($25).

(6) Each person that is licensed under this division on June 1 of any year shall pay, on or before the following July 1, a fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(7) Whenever the commissioner examines any licensee or any affiliate of a licensee, that licensee shall pay, within 10 days after receipt of a statement from the commissioner, a fee of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour for each examiner engaged in the examination plus, in case it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner.

(b) (1) Each fee for filing an application with the commissioner shall be paid at the time when the application is filed with the commissioner.

(2) No fee for filing an application with the commissioner shall be refundable, regardless of whether the application is approved, denied, withdrawn, or abandoned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 375, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Licensing [31150. - 31158.]

31150.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), no person transacting business in this state, other than a licensee, shall use any name or title which indicates that it is a business and industrial development corporation or otherwise represent that it is a business and industrial development corporation or that it is a licensee.

(b) Any California corporation which proposes to apply for a license or which has applied for a license, may, before being issued a license,
 use a name or title which indicates that it is a business and industrial development corporation if it meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The corporation shall append to the name the designation “proposed,” “in organization,” or “in formation,” or any similar designation which the commissioner may approve. The designation shall be set forth at least as conspicuously as the name or title.

(2) The corporation may perform only such acts as may be necessary (A) to apply for and obtain such license and (B) otherwise to prepare to commence transacting business as a licensee.

(3) The corporation shall not represent that it is a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 644.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31151.

No person other than a California corporation may apply for or be issued a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31152.

If the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application for a license, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(a) That the applicant has net worth in an amount which is not less than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) and which is adequate for the applicant to transact business as a business and industrial development corporation.

(b) That the applicant has lendable funds in an
 amount which is not less than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) and which is adequate for the applicant to transact business as a business and industrial development corporation.

(c) That the applicant has, in addition to the requirements of subdivision (b), financial resources in an amount which is adequate for the applicant to pay its expenses in transacting business as a business and industrial development corporation for a period of not less than three years.

(d) That the directors, officers, and controlling persons of the applicant are each of good character and sound financial standing, that the directors and officers of the applicant are each competent to perform their functions with respect to the applicant, and that the directors and officers of the applicant are collectively adequate to manage the business of the applicant as a business and
 industrial development corporation. For purposes of this subdivision, the commissioner shall accord weight to the prior or current successful operation of a commercial enterprise.

(e) That it is reasonable to believe that the applicant, if licensed, will comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(f) That the applicant has reasonable promise of successful operation as a business and industrial development corporation.

(g) That the licensing of the applicant will promote the public convenience and advantage.

If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds otherwise, he or she shall deny the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 645.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31152.5.

(a) For purposes of Section 31152, the commissioner may find:

(1) That a director, officer, or controlling person of an applicant is not of good character if the director, officer, or controlling person or any director or officer of the controlling person has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

(2) That it is not reasonable to believe that an applicant,
 if licensed, will comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division if the applicant has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be deemed to be the only grounds upon which the commissioner may find, for purposes of Section 31152, that a director, officer, or controlling person of an applicant is not of good character or that it is not reasonable to believe that an applicant, if licensed, will comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 646.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31153.

Before any applicant for a license is issued a license, each person which is a parent or subsidiary of such applicant shall file, and each person who becomes a parent or subsidiary of a licensee shall, not less than 30 days after becoming a parent or subsidiary of such licensee, file, with the commissioner, in such form as the commissioner may by regulation or order require, an agreement that such person shall comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 647.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31154.

Whenever any application for a license has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of such license have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue a license to the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 648.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31155.

No license shall be transferable or assignable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31156.

Each licensee shall post its license in a conspicuous place at its head office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31157.

No licensee shall represent that it is sponsored, recommended, or approved by, or that its abilities or qualifications have in any respect been passed upon by, the commissioner. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit a licensee from stating that it is licensed if the effect of such license is not misrepresented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 649.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31158.

(a) The fact that a California corporation is licensed under any law other than this division shall not preclude such corporation from applying for or being issued a license under this division unless the transaction of business by such corporation as a licensee under such other law would violate any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division or would be contrary to the purposes of this division.

(b) The fact that a California corporation is licensed under this division shall not preclude such corporation from applying for or
 being issued a license under any other law unless the transaction of business by such corporation as a licensee under such other law would violate any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division or would be contrary to the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Corporate Matters [31200. - 31233.]



  ARTICLE 1. Name [31200. - 31201.]

31200.

The corporate name of each licensee shall include the phrase “California business and industrial development corporation”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31201.

No licensee shall, except with the prior approval of the commissioner, transact business under any name other than its corporate name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 650.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Board of Directors [31210. - 31211.]

31210.

The board of directors of each licensee shall consist of not less than five directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

31211.

The board of directors of each licensee shall hold a meeting not less frequently than once each calendar quarter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Securities [31220. - 31220.]

31220.

Notwithstanding any other law of this state, but subject to the provisions of Section 31550:

(a) Any commercial bank, industrial bank, or trust company organized under the laws of this state may, with the prior approval of the commissioner, acquire and hold securities issued by a licensee; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of securities issued by licensees which are held by the commercial bank, industrial bank, or trust company shall not at any time exceed
 212 percent of the shareholders’ equity of the commercial bank, industrial bank, or trust company. This subdivision shall not apply to any loan or other extension of credit made by a commercial bank or industrial bank organized under the laws of this state to a licensee in accordance with the Banking Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 99)).

(b) Any savings association organized under the laws of this state may, with the prior approval of the commissioner, acquire and hold securities issued by a licensee; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of securities issued by licensees which are held by such savings association shall not at any time exceed 12 percent of the total outstanding loans of such savings association.

(c) Any insurance company admitted to transact insurance business in this state may, with the approval of the Insurance Commissioner, acquire and hold securities issued by a licensee; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of securities issued by licensees which are held by such insurance company shall not at any time exceed 212 percent of the unassigned surplus of such insurance company.

(d) Any public utility licensed or regulated by the Public Utilities Commission may, with the approval of the Public Utilities Commission, acquire and hold securities issued by a licensee; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of securities issued by licensees which are held by such public utility company shall not at any time exceed
 12 percent of the total assets of such public utility company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1015, Sec. 55.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Distributions to Shareholders [31230. - 31233.]

31230.

In this article, “distribution to its shareholders” has the meaning set forth in Corporations Code Section 166.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31231.

No licensee shall, except with the prior approval of the commissioner, make, or obligate itself to make, any distribution to its shareholders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 652.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31232.

If the commissioner finds, with respect to an application for approval for a licensee to make, or to obligate itself to make, a distribution to its shareholders:

(a) That for the applicant to make, or to obligate itself to make, the distribution will not endanger the applicant’s ability to provide financing assistance and management assistance to business firms in this state; and

(b) That for the applicant to make, or to obligate
 itself to make, the distribution will not be unsafe or unsound; the commissioner shall approve the application. If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds otherwise, he or she shall deny the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 653.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31233.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 31232, unless an application for approval for a licensee to make, or to obligate itself to make, a distribution to its shareholders is approved, denied, withdrawn, or abandoned within a period of 45 days after such application is filed with the commissioner or, if the applicant consents to an extension of the period, within such extended period, such application shall be deemed to be approved by the commissioner as of the first day after such period of 45 days or such extended period, as the case may be.

For purposes of this section, an application for approval for a licensee to make, or to obligate itself to make, a distribution to its shareholders shall be deemed to be filed with the commissioner when such application, containing all the information required by the commissioner and otherwise complying with Section 31107, is received by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 654.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Offices [31300. - 31322.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [31300. - 31305.]

31300.

Each licensee shall maintain its head office in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

31301.

No licensee shall maintain an office at any place outside this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31302.

Each office of a licensee shall be located in a place which is reasonably accessible to the public and shall, unless the commissioner approves otherwise, be open for the transaction of business during normal business hours on each business day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 655.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31303.

Each licensee shall post in a conspicuous place at each of its offices a sign which bears the corporate name of such licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31304.

Each licensee shall maintain telephone service at each of its offices and shall maintain a telephone listing under its corporate name for each of its offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31305.

Each licensee shall maintain at each of its offices personnel who are competent to conduct the business of such office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Establishing, Relocating, and Closing Offices [31320. - 31322.]

31320.

(a) No licensee shall relocate its head office without the prior approval of the commissioner.

(b) No licensee shall establish, relocate, or close any office (other than its head office) unless it files a report on the action with the commissioner not less than 30 days (or such shorter period as the commissioner may approve) before taking the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 656.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31322.

If the commissioner finds, with respect to an application by a licensee for approval to relocate its head office:

(a) That the office at its proposed location will be reasonably accessible to the public;

(b) That it is reasonable to believe that the applicant will operate the office at its proposed location in compliance with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division;

(c) That it will not be unsafe or unsound for the applicant to relocate the office; and

(d) That the relocation of the office will not be detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, or, if the relocation of the office would be detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, that the relocation of the office is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of the applicant; the commissioner shall approve the application. If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 657.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Transaction of Business [31400. - 31410.]

31400.

(a) Each licensee shall transact its business in a safe and sound manner and shall maintain itself in a safe and sound condition.

(b) No licensee shall commit any unsafe or unsound act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31401.
